dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX xD Y 51
SFX xD boire boire/m't's' boire
SFX xD boire buvant/m't's' boire
SFX xD boire bu boire
SFX xD boire bus boire
SFX xD boire bue boire
SFX xD boire bues boire
SFX xD boire bois/m' boire
SFX xD boire bois/t' boire
SFX xD boire boit/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvons boire
SFX xD boire buvez boire
SFX xD boire boivent/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvais/m' boire
SFX xD boire buvais/t' boire
SFX xD boire buvait/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvions boire
SFX xD boire buviez boire
SFX xD boire buvaient/s' boire
SFX xD boire bus/m' boire
SFX xD boire bus/t' boire
SFX xD boire but/s' boire
SFX xD boire bumes boire
SFX xD boire butes boire
SFX xD boire burent/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirai/m' boire
SFX xD boire boiras/t' boire
SFX xD boire boira/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirons boire
SFX xD boire boirez boire
SFX xD boire boiront/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirais/m' boire
SFX xD boire boirais/t' boire
SFX xD boire boirait/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirions boire
SFX xD boire boiriez boire
SFX xD boire boiraient/s' boire
SFX xD boire boive/m' boire
SFX xD boire boives/t' boire
SFX xD boire boive/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvions boire
SFX xD boire buviez boire
SFX xD boire boivent/s' boire
SFX xD boire busse/m' boire
SFX xD boire busses/t' boire
SFX xD boire but/s' boire
SFX xD boire bussions boire
SFX xD boire bussiez boire
SFX xD boire bussent/s' boire
SFX xD boire bois/t' boire
SFX xD boire buvons boire
SFX xD boire buvez boire

SFX xJ N 4
SFX xJ clure clure clure
SFX xJ clure clus clure
SFX xJ clure cluse clure
SFX xJ clure cluses clure

SFX xK Y 50
SFX xK clure clure/n'q'd'l'm't's' clure
SFX xK clure cluant/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xK clure clus/q' clure
SFX xK clure cluse/q' clure
SFX xK clure cluses/q' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clut/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluons/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluais/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluais/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluait/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluiez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluaient/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clut/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clumes/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clutes/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurai/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluras/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clura/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurons/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluront/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurais/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurais/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurait/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluriez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluraient/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clue/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clues/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clue/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluiez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clusse/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clusses/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clut/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clussions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clussiez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clussent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluons/n'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluez/n'l' clure

SFX xL Y 57
SFX xL clure clure/n'q'd'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluant/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clus/q' inclure
SFX xL clure cluse/q' inclure
SFX xL clure cluses/q' inclure
SFX xL clure clu/q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clus/q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clue/q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clues/q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clut/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluons/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluais/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure cluais/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure cluait/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluions/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluiez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluaient/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clut/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clumes/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure clutes/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure clurent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurai/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure cluras/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clura/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurons/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure clurez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluront/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurais/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clurais/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clurait/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurions/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluriez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluraient/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clue/n'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clues/n'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clue/n'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluions/n'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluiez/n'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clusse/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clusses/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clut/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clussions/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure clussiez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure clussent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure clus/t' exclure
SFX xL clure cluons/n'l' clure
SFX xL clure cluons exclure
SFX xL clure cluez/n'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluez exclure

SFX xM N 5
SFX xM ourdre ourdre sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourd sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdent sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdait sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdaient sourdre

SFX xN Y 54
SFX xN soudre soudre/n'q'd'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvant/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre sous/q' soudre
SFX xN soudre soute/q' soudre
SFX xN soudre soutes/q' soudre
SFX xN soudre solu/q' resoudre
SFX xN soudre solus/q' resoudre
SFX xN soudre solue/q' resoudre
SFX xN soudre solues/q' resoudre
SFX xN soudre sous/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre sous/n'q'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre sout/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvons/n'q'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvez/n'q'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvent/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvais/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvais/n'q'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvait/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvions/n'q'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solviez/n'q'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvaient/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solus/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solus/n'q'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solut/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solumes/n'q'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solutes/n'q'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre solurent/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrai/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudras/n'q'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudra/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrons/n'q'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrez/n'q'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudront/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrais/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrais/n'q'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrait/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudrions/n'q'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudriez/n'q'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre soudraient/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solve/n'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solves/n'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solve/n'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvions/n'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solviez/n'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvent/n'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solusse/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solusses/n'q'l'm't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solut/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre solussions/n'q'l't' soudre
SFX xN soudre solussiez/n'q'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre solussent/n'q'l'm't's' soudre
SFX xN soudre sous/n'l'm' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvons/n'l' soudre
SFX xN soudre solvez/n'l'm' soudre
