dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
absoudre/xN()
conclure/xL()
dissoudre/xN()
emboire/xD()
exclure/xL()
inclure/xL()
occlure/xK()
reclure/xJ()
resoudre/xN()
sourdre/xM()
